Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
577

CHILDREN

Section

577-1 Age of majority

577-2 Minority of veteran or of the veteran's
spouse,

no bar when

577-3 Natural guardian; liability for torts of
child

577-3.5 Property damage, parental responsibility

577-4 Stepparent; when required to support
stepchild

577-5 Repealed

577-6 Duty of minor children

577-7 Parents' control and duties

577-7.5 Parental preferences in government
contracts,

programs, and services

577-8 Repealed

577-9 Jury trial, when

577-10 Court having jurisdiction

577-11 to 13 Repealed

577-14 Children born to parents not married to
each other;

support

577-15 Children deemed to be orphans

577-16 Curfew; children in public streets,
prohibited

when; penalty

577-16.5 Sentencing for the violation of curfew

577-17 Repealed

577-18 Parents allowing children in street,
prohibited

when; penalty

577-19 Children prohibited in certain places,
when; penalty

577-20 Arrest, when in such places

577-21 Curfew ordinances, effect

577-22 Dancing partners, patrons, age limit

577-23 Parent et al. responsibility, penalty

577-24 Escort's responsibility; penalty

577-25 Emancipation of certain minors

577-26 Alcohol or drug abuse relating to minors;
diagnosis,

counseling, and related activities

577-27 Missing children; reporting

577-28 Affidavit of caregiver consent for minor's
health

care

577-29 Mental health services relating to minors;
diagnosis,

counseling, and related activities

Cross References

Commission on fatherhood, see chapter 577E.

Interstate compact and commission on educational opportunity
for military children, see chapter 311D.

Law Journals and Reviews

Consent for Testing and Treatment of Minors in Hawaii. 13
HBJ, no. 13, at 165 (2009).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next